Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2011
Department; maintenance and operation of hospitals and medical facilities; prescribe minimum standards.

The department shall by regulation prescribe minimum standards for the maintenance and operation of hospitals and other medical facilities which receive federal aid for construction under the state plan.

Laws 1947, c. 232, § 11, p. 737;

Laws 1965, c. 421, § 9, p. 1353;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 514.